Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-11,125
Rehabilitation services; federal funds; State Treasurer; duties.

The State Treasurer is designated as the custodian of all funds received by the state from appropriations made by the Congress of the United States or from other sources for the purpose of carrying out any state or federal act pertaining to vocational rehabilitation. The State Treasurer is authorized to receive and provide for the proper custody of such funds and to establish such special funds and accounts as may be necessary and shall make disbursements from such funds and accounts for vocational rehabilitation purposes upon certification in the manner provided in subdivision (5) of section 79-11,122.

Laws 1955, c. 324, § 5, p. 1003;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1450;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 907.